Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3204
Order; mileage and expenses; order effective, when; conditions.

The order to the witness and to the person having custody of the witness shall provide for the return of the witness at the conclusion of his or her testimony, proper safeguards on his or her custody, and proper financial reimbursement or prepayment by the requesting jurisdiction for all expenses incurred in the production and return of the witness, and may prescribe such other conditions as the judge thinks proper or necessary. Mileage and expenses shall be allowed as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177 for state employees. The order shall not become effective until the judge of the state requesting the witness enters an order directing compliance with the conditions prescribed.

Laws 1969, c. 229, § 4, p. 855;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 45.